Alabama, session 2026rs, HB90.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. The following amendment to the Constitution
of Alabama of 2022, is proposed:
PROPOSED AMENDMENT
In St. Clair County, the mayor of a municipality that
participates in the Employees' Retirement System of Alabama
may participate in the retirement system upon the same terms
and conditions as may be specified by law for any other
employee in the same retirement system. A mayor holding office
at the time of ratification of this amendment shall be
eligible to purchase service credit in the Employees'
Retirement System of Alabama for the time the official has
served in that office. No person may participate in both a
supernumerary program and the Employees' Retirement System of
Alabama based on the same service.
Upon ratification of this constitutional amendment, the
Code Commissioner shall number and place this amendment as
appropriate in the constitution omitting this instructional
paragraph and may make the following nonsubstantive revisions:
change capitalization, hierarchy, spelling, and punctuation
for purposes of style and uniformity; correct manifest
grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
Page 1

grammatical, clerical, and typographical errors; revise
HB90 Enrolled
internal or external citations and cross-references; harmonize
language; and translate effective dates.
END PROPOSED AMENDMENT
Section 2. An election upon the proposed amendment
shall be held in accordance with Sections 284, 284.01, and 285
of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, and the election laws
of this state. The appropriate election official shall assign
a ballot number for the proposed constitutional amendment on
the election ballot and shall set forth the following
description of the substance or subject matter of the proposed
constitutional amendment:
"Relating to St. Clair County, proposing an amendment
to the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, to allow mayors to
participate in the Employees' Retirement System of Alabama
under certain conditions.
Proposed by Act ____."
This description shall be followed by the following
language:
"Yes( ) No( )."
Section 3. The proposed amendment shall become valid as
part of the Constitution of Alabama of 2022, when approved by
a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
Page 2

a majority of the qualified electors voting thereon.
HB90 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 21-Jan-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 12-Feb-26 Passed



Page 3